Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1807
Mandated project charge, defined.

Mandated project charge means a charge paid by customers of a public entity to pay or reimburse the public entity for mandated project costs, including any adjustment of the charge pursuant to subdivision (1)(d) of section 70-1812, or financing costs.

Laws 2006, LB 548, § 7.